Ohio, session 136, SB291.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 2925.11, 2929.15, 2929.20, 2929.25, 2951.02, and 2951.07 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 2925.11. (A) No person shall knowingly obtain, possess, or use a controlled substance or a controlled substance analog. (B)(1) This section does not apply to any of the following: (a) Manufacturers, licensed health professionals authorized to prescribe drugs, pharmacists, owners of pharmacies, and other persons whose conduct was in accordance with Chapters 3719., 4715., 4723., 4729., 4730., 4731., 4741., and 4772. of the Revised Code; (b) If the offense involves an anabolic steroid, any person who is conducting or participating in a research project involving the use of an anabolic steroid if the project has been approved by the United States food and drug administration; (c) Any person who sells, offers for sale, prescribes, dispenses, or administers for livestock or other nonhuman species an anabolic steroid that is expressly intended for administration through implants to livestock or other nonhuman species and approved for that purpose under the "Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act," 52 Stat. 1040 (1938), 21 U.S.C.A. 301, as amended, and is sold, offered for sale, prescribed, dispensed, or administered for that purpose in accordance with that act; (d) Any person who obtained the controlled substance pursuant to a prescription issued by a licensed health professional authorized to prescribe drugs if the prescription was issued for a legitimate medical purpose and not altered, forged, or obtained through deception or commission of a theft offense. As used in division (B)(1)(d) of this section, "deception" and "theft offense" have the same meanings as in section 2913.01 of the Revised Code. (2)(a) As used in division (B)(2) of this section: (i) "Community addiction services provider" has the same meaning as in section 5119.01 of the Revised Code. (ii) "Community control sanction" has the same meaning as in section 2929.01 of the Revised Code. (iii) "Health care facility" has the same meaning as in section 2919.16 of the Revised Code. (iv) "Minor drug possession offense" means a violation of this section that is a misdemeanor or a felony of the fifth degree. (v) "Post-release control sanction" has the same meaning as in section 2967.28 of the Revised Code. (vi) "Peace officer" has the same meaning as in section 2935.01 of the Revised Code. (vii) "Public agency" has the same meaning as in section 2930.01 of the Revised Code. (viii) "Qualified individual" means a person who is acting in good faith who seeks or obtains medical assistance for another person who is experiencing a drug overdose, a person who experiences a drug overdose and who seeks medical assistance for that overdose, or a person who is the subject of another person seeking or obtaining medical assistance for that overdose as described in division (B)(2)(b) of this section. (ix) "Seek or obtain medical assistance" includes, but is not limited to making a 9-1-1 call, contacting in person or by telephone call an on-duty peace officer, or transporting or presenting a person to a health care facility. (b) Subject to division (B)(2)(e) of this section, a qualified individual shall not be arrested, charged, prosecuted, convicted, or penalized pursuant to this chapter for a minor drug possession offense or a violation of section 2925.12, division (C)(1) of section 2925.14, or section 2925.141 of the Revised Code if all of the following apply: (i) The evidence of the obtaining, possession, or use of the controlled substance or controlled substance analog, drug abuse instruments, or drug paraphernalia that would be the basis of the offense was obtained as a result of the qualified individual seeking the medical assistance or experiencing an overdose and needing medical assistance. (ii) Subject to division (B)(2)(f) of this section, within thirty days after seeking or obtaining the medical assistance, the qualified individual seeks and obtains a screening and receives a referral for treatment from a community addiction services provider or a properly credentialed addiction treatment professional. (iii) Subject to division (B)(2)(f) of this section, the qualified individual who obtains a screening and receives a referral for treatment under division (B)(2)(b)(ii) of this section, upon the request of any prosecuting attorney, submits documentation to the prosecuting attorney that verifies that the qualified individual satisfied the requirements of that division. The documentation shall be limited to the date and time of the screening obtained and referral received. (c) If a person who is serving a community control sanction or is under a sanction on post-release control acts pursuant to division (B)(2)(b) of this section, then division (B) of section 2929.141, division (B)(2)(3) of section 2929.15, division (D)(3)(4) of section 2929.25, or division (F)(3) of section 2967.28 of the Revised Code applies to the person with respect to any violation of the sanction or post-release control sanction based on a minor drug possession offense, as defined in section 2925.11 of the Revised Code, or a violation of section 2925.12, division (C)(1) of section 2925.14, or section 2925.141 of the Revised Code. (d) Nothing in division (B)(2)(b) of this section shall be construed to do any of the following: (i) Limit the admissibility of any evidence in connection with the investigation or prosecution of a crime with regards to a defendant who does not qualify for the protections of division (B)(2)(b) of this section or with regards to any crime other than a minor drug possession offense or a violation of section 2925.12, division (C)(1) of section 2925.14, or section 2925.141 of the Revised Code committed by a person who qualifies for protection pursuant to division (B)(2)(b) of this section; (ii) Limit any seizure of evidence or contraband otherwise permitted by law; (iii) Limit or abridge the authority of a peace officer to detain or take into custody a person in the course of an investigation or to effectuate an arrest for any offense except as provided in that division; (iv) Limit, modify, or remove any immunity from liability available pursuant to law in effect prior to September 13, 2016, to any public agency or to an employee of any public agency. (e) Division (B)(2)(b) of this section does not apply to any person who twice previously has been granted an immunity under division (B)(2)(b) of this section. No person shall be granted an immunity under division (B)(2)(b) of this section more than two times. (f) Nothing in this section shall compel any qualified individual to disclose protected health information in a way that conflicts with the requirements of the "Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996," 104 Pub. L. No. 191, 110 Stat. 2021, 42 U.S.C. 1320d et seq., as amended, and regulations promulgated by the United States department of health and human services to implement the act or the requirements of 42 C.F.R. Part 2. (C) Whoever violates division (A) of this section is guilty of one of the following: (1) If the drug involved in the violation is a compound, mixture, preparation, or substance included in schedule I or II, with the exception of marihuana, cocaine, L.S.D., heroin, any fentanyl-related compound, hashish, and any controlled substance analog, whoever violates division (A) of this section is guilty of aggravated possession of drugs. The penalty for the offense shall be determined as follows: (a) Except as otherwise provided in division (C)(1)(b), (c), (d), or (e) of this section, aggravated possession of drugs is a felony of the fifth degree, and division (B) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code applies in determining whether to impose a prison term on the offender. (b) If the amount of the drug involved equals or exceeds the bulk amount but is less than five times the bulk amount, aggravated possession of drugs is a felony of the third degree, and there is a presumption for a prison term for the offense. (c) If the amount of the drug involved equals or exceeds five times the bulk amount but is less than fifty times the bulk amount, aggravated possession of drugs is a felony of the second degree, and the court shall impose as a mandatory prison term a second degree felony mandatory prison term. (d) If the amount of the drug involved equals or exceeds fifty times the bulk amount but is less than one hundred times the bulk amount, aggravated possession of drugs is a felony of the first degree, and the court shall impose as a mandatory prison term a first degree felony mandatory prison term. (e) If the amount of the drug involved equals or exceeds one hundred times the bulk amount, aggravated possession of drugs is a felony of the first degree, the offender is a major drug offender, and the court shall impose as a mandatory prison term a maximum first degree felony mandatory prison term. (2) If the drug involved in the violation is a compound, mixture, preparation, or substance included in schedule III, IV, or V, whoever violates division (A) of this section is guilty of possession of drugs. The penalty for the offense shall be determined as follows: (a) Except as otherwise provided in division (C)(2)(b), (c), or (d) of this section, possession of drugs is a misdemeanor of the first degree or, if the offender previously has been convicted of a drug abuse offense, a felony of the fifth degree. (b) If the amount of the drug involved equals or exceeds the bulk amount but is less than five times the bulk amount, possession of drugs is a felony of the fourth degree, and division (C) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code applies in determining whether to impose a prison term on the offender. (c) If the amount of the drug involved equals or exceeds five times the bulk amount but is less than fifty times the bulk amount, possession of drugs is a felony of the third degree, and there is a presumption for a prison term for the offense. (d) If the amount of the drug involved equals or exceeds fifty times the bulk amount, possession of drugs is a felony of the second degree, and the court shall impose upon the offender as a mandatory prison term a second degree felony mandatory prison term. (3) If the drug involved in the violation is marihuana or a compound, mixture, preparation, or substance containing marihuana other than hashish, whoever violates division (A) of this section is guilty of possession of marihuana. The penalty for the offense shall be determined as follows: (a) Except as otherwise provided in division (C)(3)(b), (c), (d), (e), (f), or (g) of this section, possession of marihuana is a minor misdemeanor. (b) If the amount of the drug involved equals or exceeds one hundred grams but is less than two hundred grams, possession of marihuana is a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. (c) If the amount of the drug involved equals or exceeds two hundred grams but is less than one thousand grams, possession of marihuana is a felony of the fifth degree, and division (B) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code applies in determining whether to impose a prison term on the offender. (d) If the amount of the drug involved equals or exceeds one thousand grams but is less than five thousand grams, possession of marihuana is a felony of the third degree, and division (C) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code applies in determining whether to impose a prison term on the offender. (e) If the amount of the drug involved equals or exceeds five thousand grams but is less than twenty thousand grams, possession of marihuana is a felony of the third degree, and there is a presumption that a prison term shall be imposed for the offense. (f) If the amount of the drug involved equals or exceeds twenty thousand grams but is less than forty thousand grams, possession of marihuana is a felony of the second degree, and the court shall impose as a mandatory prison term a second degree felony mandatory prison term of five, six, seven, or eight years. (g) If the amount of the drug involved equals or exceeds forty thousand grams, possession of marihuana is a felony of the second degree, and the court shall impose as a mandatory prison term a maximum second degree felony mandatory prison term. (4) If the drug involved in the violation is cocaine or a compound, mixture, preparation, or substance containing cocaine, whoever violates division (A) of this section is guilty of possession of cocaine. The penalty for the offense shall be determined as follows: (a) Except as otherwise provided in division (C)(4)(b), (c), (d), (e), or (f) of this section, possession of cocaine is a felony of the fifth degree, and division (B) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code applies in determining whether to impose a prison term on the offender. (b) If the amount of the drug involved equals or exceeds five grams but is less than ten grams of cocaine, possession of cocaine is a felony of the fourth degree, and division (B) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code applies in determining whether to impose a prison term on the offender. (c) If the amount of the drug involved equals or exceeds ten grams but is less than twenty grams of cocaine, possession of cocaine is a felony of the third degree, and, except as otherwise provided in this division, there is a presumption for a prison term for the offense. If possession of cocaine is a felony of the third degree under this division and if the offender two or more times previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a felony drug abuse offense, the court shall impose as a mandatory prison term one of the prison terms prescribed for a felony of the third degree. (d) If the amount of the drug involved equals or exceeds twenty grams but is less than twenty-seven grams of cocaine, possession of cocaine is a felony of the second degree, and the court shall impose as a mandatory prison term a second degree felony mandatory prison term. (e) If the amount of the drug involved equals or exceeds twenty-seven grams but is less than one hundred grams of cocaine, possession of cocaine is a felony of the first degree, and the court shall impose as a mandatory prison term a first degree felony mandatory prison term. (f) If the amount of the drug involved equals or exceeds one hundred grams of cocaine, possession of cocaine is a felony of the first degree, the offender is a major drug offender, and the court shall impose as a mandatory prison term a maximum first degree felony mandatory prison term. (5) If the drug involved in the violation is L.S.D., whoever violates division (A) of this section is guilty of possession of L.S.D. The penalty for the offense shall be determined as follows: (a) Except as otherwise provided in division (C)(5)(b), (c), (d), (e), or (f) of this section, possession of L.S.D. is a felony of the fifth degree, and division (B) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code applies in determining whether to impose a prison term on the offender. (b) If the amount of L.S.D. involved equals or exceeds ten unit doses but is less than fifty unit doses of L.S.D. in a solid form or equals or exceeds one gram but is less than five grams of L.S.D. in a liquid concentrate, liquid extract, or liquid distillate form, possession of L.S.D. is a felony of the fourth degree, and division (C) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code applies in determining whether to impose a prison term on the offender. (c) If the amount of L.S.D. involved equals or exceeds fifty unit doses, but is less than two hundred fifty unit doses of L.S.D. in a solid form or equals or exceeds five grams but is less than twenty-five grams of L.S.D. in a liquid concentrate, liquid extract, or liquid distillate form, possession of L.S.D. is a felony of the third degree, and there is a presumption for a prison term for the offense. (d) If the amount of L.S.D. involved equals or exceeds two hundred fifty unit doses but is less than one thousand unit doses of L.S.D. in a solid form or equals or exceeds twenty-five grams but is less than one hundred grams of L.S.D. in a liquid concentrate, liquid extract, or liquid distillate form, possession of L.S.D. is a felony of the second degree, and the court shall impose as a mandatory prison term a second degree felony mandatory prison term. (e) If the amount of L.S.D. involved equals or exceeds one thousand unit doses but is less than five thousand unit doses of L.S.D. in a solid form or equals or exceeds one hundred grams but is less than five hundred grams of L.S.D. in a liquid concentrate, liquid extract, or liquid distillate form, possession of L.S.D. is a felony of the first degree, and the court shall impose as a mandatory prison term a first degree felony mandatory prison term. (f) If the amount of L.S.D. involved equals or exceeds five thousand unit doses of L.S.D. in a solid form or equals or exceeds five hundred grams of L.S.D. in a liquid concentrate, liquid extract, or liquid distillate form, possession of L.S.D. is a felony of the first degree, the offender is a major drug offender, and the court shall impose as a mandatory prison term a maximum first degree felony mandatory prison term. (6) If the drug involved in the violation is heroin or a compound, mixture, preparation, or substance containing heroin, whoever violates division (A) of this section is guilty of possession of heroin. The penalty for the offense shall be determined as follows: (a) Except as otherwise provided in division (C)(6)(b), (c), (d), (e), or (f) of this section, possession of heroin is a felony of the fifth degree, and division (B) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code applies in determining whether to impose a prison term on the offender. (b) If the amount of the drug involved equals or exceeds ten unit doses but is less than fifty unit doses or equals or exceeds one gram but is less than five grams, possession of heroin is a felony of the fourth degree, and division (C) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code applies in determining whether to impose a prison term on the offender. (c) If the amount of the drug involved equals or exceeds fifty unit doses but is less than one hundred unit doses or equals or exceeds five grams but is less than ten grams, possession of heroin is a felony of the third degree, and there is a presumption for a prison term for the offense. (d) If the amount of the drug involved equals or exceeds one hundred unit doses but is less than five hundred unit doses or equals or exceeds ten grams but is less than fifty grams, possession of heroin is a felony of the second degree, and the court shall impose as a mandatory prison term a second degree felony mandatory prison term. (e) If the amount of the drug involved equals or exceeds five hundred unit doses but is less than one thousand unit doses or equals or exceeds fifty grams but is less than one hundred grams, possession of heroin is a felony of the first degree, and the court shall impose as a mandatory prison term a first degree felony mandatory prison term. (f) If the amount of the drug involved equals or exceeds one thousand unit doses or equals or exceeds one hundred grams, possession of heroin is a felony of the first degree, the offender is a major drug offender, and the court shall impose as a mandatory prison term a maximum first degree felony mandatory prison term. (7) If the drug involved in the violation is hashish or a compound, mixture, preparation, or substance containing hashish, whoever violates division (A) of this section is guilty of possession of hashish. The penalty for the offense shall be determined as follows: (a) Except as otherwise provided in division (C)(7)(b), (c), (d), (e), (f), or (g) of this section, possession of hashish is a minor misdemeanor. (b) If the amount of the drug involved equals or exceeds five grams but is less than ten grams of hashish in a solid form or equals or exceeds one gram but is less than two grams of hashish in a liquid concentrate, liquid extract, or liquid distillate form, possession of hashish is a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. (c) If the amount of the drug involved equals or exceeds ten grams but is less than fifty grams of hashish in a solid form or equals or exceeds two grams but is less than ten grams of hashish in a liquid concentrate, liquid extract, or liquid distillate form, possession of hashish is a felony of the fifth degree, and division (B) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code applies in determining whether to impose a prison term on the offender. (d) If the amount of the drug involved equals or exceeds fifty grams but is less than two hundred fifty grams of hashish in a solid form or equals or exceeds ten grams but is less than fifty grams of hashish in a liquid concentrate, liquid extract, or liquid distillate form, possession of hashish is a felony of the third degree, and division (C) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code applies in determining whether to impose a prison term on the offender. (e) If the amount of the drug involved equals or exceeds two hundred fifty grams but is less than one thousand grams of hashish in a solid form or equals or exceeds fifty grams but is less than two hundred grams of hashish in a liquid concentrate, liquid extract, or liquid distillate form, possession of hashish is a felony of the third degree, and there is a presumption that a prison term shall be imposed for the offense. (f) If the amount of the drug involved equals or exceeds one thousand grams but is less than two thousand grams of hashish in a solid form or equals or exceeds two hundred grams but is less than four hundred grams of hashish in a liquid concentrate, liquid extract, or liquid distillate form, possession of hashish is a felony of the second degree, and the court shall impose as a mandatory prison term a second degree felony mandatory prison term of five, six, seven, or eight years. (g) If the amount of the drug involved equals or exceeds two thousand grams of hashish in a solid form or equals or exceeds four hundred grams of hashish in a liquid concentrate, liquid extract, or liquid distillate form, possession of hashish is a felony of the second degree, and the court shall impose as a mandatory prison term a maximum second degree felony mandatory prison term. (8) If the drug involved is a controlled substance analog or compound, mixture, preparation, or substance that contains a controlled substance analog, whoever violates division (A) of this section is guilty of possession of a controlled substance analog. The penalty for the offense shall be determined as follows: (a) Except as otherwise provided in division (C)(8)(b), (c), (d), (e), or (f) of this section, possession of a controlled substance analog is a felony of the fifth degree, and division (B) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code applies in determining whether to impose a prison term on the offender. (b) If the amount of the drug involved equals or exceeds ten grams but is less than twenty grams, possession of a controlled substance analog is a felony of the fourth degree, and there is a presumption for a prison term for the offense. (c) If the amount of the drug involved equals or exceeds twenty grams but is less than thirty grams, possession of a controlled substance analog is a felony of the third degree, and there is a presumption for a prison term for the offense. (d) If the amount of the drug involved equals or exceeds thirty grams but is less than forty grams, possession of a controlled substance analog is a felony of the second degree, and the court shall impose as a mandatory prison term a second degree felony mandatory prison term. (e) If the amount of the drug involved equals or exceeds forty grams but is less than fifty grams, possession of a controlled substance analog is a felony of the first degree, and the court shall impose as a mandatory prison term a first degree felony mandatory prison term. (f) If the amount of the drug involved equals or exceeds fifty grams, possession of a controlled substance analog is a felony of the first degree, the offender is a major drug offender, and the court shall impose as a mandatory prison term a maximum first degree felony mandatory prison term. (9) If the drug involved in the violation is a compound, mixture, preparation, or substance that is a combination of a fentanyl-related compound and marihuana, one of the following applies: (a) Except as otherwise provided in division (C)(9)(b) of this section, the offender is guilty of possession of marihuana and shall be punished as provided in division (C)(3) of this section. Except as otherwise provided in division (C)(9)(b) of this section, the offender is not guilty of possession of a fentanyl-related compound under division (C)(11) of this section and shall not be charged with, convicted of, or punished under division (C)(11) of this section for possession of a fentanyl-related compound. (b) If the offender knows or has reason to know that the compound, mixture, preparation, or substance that is the drug involved contains a fentanyl-related compound, the offender is guilty of possession of a fentanyl-related compound and shall be punished under division (C)(11) of this section. (10) If the drug involved in the violation is a compound, mixture, preparation, or substance that is a combination of a fentanyl-related compound and any schedule III, schedule IV, or schedule V controlled substance that is not a fentanyl-related compound, one of the following applies: (a) Except as otherwise provided in division (C)(10)(b) of this section, the offender is guilty of possession of drugs and shall be punished as provided in division (C)(2) of this section. Except as otherwise provided in division (C)(10)(b) of this section, the offender is not guilty of possession of a fentanyl-related compound under division (C)(11) of this section and shall not be charged with, convicted of, or punished under division (C)(11) of this section for possession of a fentanyl-related compound. (b) If the offender knows or has reason to know that the compound, mixture, preparation, or substance that is the drug involved contains a fentanyl-related compound, the offender is guilty of possession of a fentanyl-related compound and shall be punished under division (C)(11) of this section. (11) If the drug involved in the violation is a fentanyl-related compound and neither division (C)(9)(a) nor division (C)(10)(a) of this section applies to the drug involved, or is a compound, mixture, preparation, or substance that contains a fentanyl-related compound or is a combination of a fentanyl-related compound and any other controlled substance and neither division (C)(9)(a) nor division (C)(10)(a) of this section applies to the drug involved, whoever violates division (A) of this section is guilty of possession of a fentanyl-related compound. The penalty for the offense shall be determined as follows: (a) Except as otherwise provided in division (C)(11)(b), (c), (d), (e), (f), or (g) of this section, possession of a fentanyl-related compound is a felony of the fifth degree, and division (B) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code applies in determining whether to impose a prison term on the offender. (b) If the amount of the drug involved equals or exceeds ten unit doses but is less than fifty unit doses or equals or exceeds one gram but is less than five grams, possession of a fentanyl-related compound is a felony of the fourth degree, and division (C) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code applies in determining whether to impose a prison term on the offender. (c) If the amount of the drug involved equals or exceeds fifty unit doses but is less than one hundred unit doses or equals or exceeds five grams but is less than ten grams, possession of a fentanyl-related compound is a felony of the third degree, and there is a presumption for a prison term for the offense. (d) If the amount of the drug involved equals or exceeds one hundred unit doses but is less than two hundred unit doses or equals or exceeds ten grams but is less than twenty grams, possession of a fentanyl-related compound is a felony of the second degree, and the court shall impose as a mandatory prison term one of the prison terms prescribed for a felony of the second degree. (e) If the amount of the drug involved equals or exceeds two hundred unit doses but is less than five hundred unit doses or equals or exceeds twenty grams but is less than fifty grams, possession of a fentanyl-related compound is a felony of the first degree, and the court shall impose as a mandatory prison term one of the prison terms prescribed for a felony of the first degree. (f) If the amount of the drug involved equals or exceeds five hundred unit doses but is less than one thousand unit doses or equals or exceeds fifty grams but is less than one hundred grams, possession of a fentanyl-related compound is a felony of the first degree, and the court shall impose as a mandatory prison term the maximum prison term prescribed for a felony of the first degree. (g) If the amount of the drug involved equals or exceeds one thousand unit doses or equals or exceeds one hundred grams, possession of a fentanyl-related compound is a felony of the first degree, the offender is a major drug offender, and the court shall impose as a mandatory prison term the maximum prison term prescribed for a felony of the first degree. (D) Arrest or conviction for a minor misdemeanor violation of this section does not constitute a criminal record and need not be reported by the person so arrested or convicted in response to any inquiries about the person's criminal record, including any inquiries contained in any application for employment, license, or other right or privilege, or made in connection with the person's appearance as a witness. (E) In addition to any prison term or jail term authorized or required by division (C) of this section and sections 2929.13, 2929.14, 2929.22, 2929.24, and 2929.25 of the Revised Code and in addition to any other sanction that is imposed for the offense under this section, sections 2929.11 to 2929.18, or sections 2929.21 to 2929.28 of the Revised Code, if applicable, the court also shall do the following: (1)(a) If the violation is a felony of the first, second, or third degree, the court shall impose upon the offender the mandatory fine specified for the offense under division (B)(1) of section 2929.18 of the Revised Code unless, as specified in that division, the court determines that the offender is indigent. (b) Notwithstanding any contrary provision of section 3719.21 of the Revised Code, the clerk of the court shall pay a mandatory fine or other fine imposed for a violation of this section pursuant to division (A) of section 2929.18 of the Revised Code in accordance with and subject to the requirements of division (F) of section 2925.03 of the Revised Code. The agency that receives the fine shall use the fine as specified in division (F) of section 2925.03 of the Revised Code. (c) If a person is charged with a violation of this section that is a felony of the first, second, or third degree, posts bail, and forfeits the bail, the clerk shall pay the forfeited bail pursuant to division (E)(1)(b) of this section as if it were a mandatory fine imposed under division (E)(1)(a) of this section. (2) If the offender is a professionally licensed person, in addition to any other sanction imposed for a violation of this section, the court immediately shall comply with section 2925.38 of the Revised Code. (3) If the offender has a driver's or commercial driver's license or permit, section 2929.33 of the Revised Code applies. (F) It is an affirmative defense, as provided in section 2901.05 of the Revised Code, to a charge of a fourth degree felony violation under this section that the controlled substance that gave rise to the charge is in an amount, is in a form, is prepared, compounded, or mixed with substances that are not controlled substances in a manner, or is possessed under any other circumstances, that indicate that the substance was possessed solely for personal use. Notwithstanding any contrary provision of this section, if, in accordance with section 2901.05 of the Revised Code, an accused who is charged with a fourth degree felony violation of division (C)(2), (4), (5), or (6) of this section sustains the burden of going forward with evidence of and establishes by a preponderance of the evidence the affirmative defense described in this division, the accused may be prosecuted for and may plead guilty to or be convicted of a misdemeanor violation of division (C)(2) of this section or a fifth degree felony violation of division (C)(4), (5), or (6) of this section respectively. (G) When a person is charged with possessing a bulk amount or multiple of a bulk amount, division (E) of section 2925.03 of the Revised Code applies regarding the determination of the amount of the controlled substance involved at the time of the offense. (H) It is an affirmative defense to a charge of possession of a controlled substance analog under division (C)(8) of this section that the person charged with violating that offense obtained, possessed, or used one of the following items that are excluded from the meaning of "controlled substance analog" under section 3719.01 of the Revised Code: (1) A controlled substance; (2) Any substance for which there is an approved new drug application; (3) With respect to a particular person, any substance if an exemption is in effect for investigational use for that person pursuant to federal law to the extent that conduct with respect to that substance is pursuant to that exemption. (I) Any offender who received a mandatory suspension of the offender's driver's or commercial driver's license or permit under this section prior to September 13, 2016, may file a motion with the sentencing court requesting the termination of the suspension. However, an offender who pleaded guilty to or was convicted of a violation of section 4511.19 of the Revised Code or a substantially similar municipal ordinance or law of another state or the United States that arose out of the same set of circumstances as the violation for which the offender's license or permit was suspended under this section shall not file such a motion. Upon the filing of a motion under division (I) of this section, the sentencing court, in its discretion, may terminate the suspension. Sec. 2929.15. (A)(1) If in sentencing an offender for a felony the court is not required to impose a prison term, a mandatory prison term, or a term of life imprisonment upon the offender, the court may directly impose a sentence that consists of one or more community control sanctions authorized pursuant to section 2929.16, 2929.17, or 2929.18 of the Revised Code. If the court is sentencing an offender for a fourth degree felony OVI offense under division (G)(1) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code, in addition to the mandatory term of local incarceration imposed under that division and the mandatory fine required by division (B)(3) of section 2929.18 of the Revised Code, the court may impose upon the offender a community control sanction or combination of community control sanctions in accordance with sections 2929.16 and 2929.17 of the Revised Code. If the court is sentencing an offender for a third or fourth degree felony OVI offense under division (G)(2) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code, in addition to the mandatory prison term or mandatory prison term and additional prison term imposed under that division, the court also may impose upon the offender a community control sanction or combination of community control sanctions under section 2929.16 or 2929.17 of the Revised Code, but the offender shall serve all of the prison terms so imposed prior to serving the community control sanction. The Except as provided in divisions (B)(1)(c), (d), and (e) of this section, the duration of all community control sanctions imposed on an offender under this division shall not exceed five years for any felony of the first or second degree and three years for any felony of the third, fourth, or fifth degree. If the offender absconds or otherwise leaves the jurisdiction of the court in which the offender resides without obtaining permission from the court or the offender's probation officer to leave the jurisdiction of the court, or if the offender is confined in any institution for the commission of any offense while under a community control sanction, the period of the community control sanction ceases to run until the offender is brought before the court for its further action. If the court sentences the offender to one or more nonresidential sanctions under section 2929.17 of the Revised Code, the court shall impose as a condition of the nonresidential sanctions that, during the period of the sanctions, the offender must abide by the law and must not leave the state without the permission of the court or the offender's probation officer. The court may impose any other conditions of release under a community control sanction that the court considers appropriate, including, but not limited to, requiring that the offender not ingest or be injected with a drug of abuse and submit to random drug testing as provided in division (D)(E) of this section to determine whether the offender ingested or was injected with a drug of abuse and requiring that the results of the drug test indicate that the offender did not ingest or was not injected with a drug of abuse. (2)(a) If a court sentences an offender to any community control sanction or combination of community control sanctions authorized pursuant to section 2929.16, 2929.17, or 2929.18 of the Revised Code, the court shall place the offender under the general control and supervision of a department of probation in the county that serves the court for purposes of reporting to the court a violation of any condition of the sanctions, any condition of release under a community control sanction imposed by the court, a violation of law, or the departure of the offender from this state without the permission of the court or the offender's probation officer. Alternatively, if the offender resides in another county and a county department of probation has been established in that county or that county is served by a multicounty probation department established under section 2301.27 of the Revised Code, the court may request the court of common pleas of that county to receive the offender into the general control and supervision of that county or multicounty department of probation for purposes of reporting to the court a violation of any condition of the sanctions, any condition of release under a community control sanction imposed by the court, a violation of law, or the departure of the offender from this state without the permission of the court or the offender's probation officer, subject to the jurisdiction of the trial judge over and with respect to the person of the offender, and to the rules governing that department of probation. If there is no department of probation in the county that serves the court, the court shall place the offender, regardless of the offender's county of residence, under the general control and supervision of the adult parole authority, unless the court has entered into an agreement with the authority as described in division (B) or (C) of section 2301.32 of the Revised Code, or under an entity authorized under division (B) of section 2301.27 of the Revised Code to provide probation and supervisory services to counties for purposes of reporting to the court a violation of any of the sanctions, any condition of release under a community control sanction imposed by the court, a violation of law, or the departure of the offender from this state without the permission of the court or the offender's probation officer. (b) If the court imposing sentence on an offender sentences the offender to any community control sanction or combination of community control sanctions authorized pursuant to section 2929.16, 2929.17, or 2929.18 of the Revised Code, and if the offender violates any condition of the sanctions, violates any condition of release under a community control sanction imposed by the court, violates any law, or departs the state without the permission of the court or the offender's probation officer, the public or private person or entity that operates or administers the sanction or the program or activity that comprises the sanction shall report the violation or departure directly to the sentencing court, or shall report the violation or departure to the county or multicounty department of probation with general control and supervision over the offender under division (A)(2)(a) of this section or the officer of that department who supervises the offender, or, if there is no such department with general control and supervision over the offender under that division, to the adult parole authority unless the court has entered into an agreement with the authority as described in division (B) or (C) of section 2301.32 of the Revised Code, or to an entity authorized under division (B) of section 2301.27 of the Revised Code to provide probation and supervisory services to the county. If the public or private person or entity that operates or administers the sanction or the program or activity that comprises the sanction reports the violation or departure to the county or multicounty department of probation, the adult parole authority, or any other entity providing probation and supervisory services to the county, the department's, authority's, or other entity's officers may treat the offender as if the offender were on probation and in violation of the probation, and shall report the violation of the condition of the sanction, any condition of release under a community control sanction imposed by the court, the violation of law, or the departure from the state without the required permission to the sentencing court. (3) If an offender who is eligible for community control sanctions under this section admits to having a drug addiction or the court has reason to believe that the offender has a drug addiction, and if the offense for which the offender is being sentenced was related to the addiction, the court may require that the offender be assessed by a properly credentialed professional within a specified period of time and shall require the professional to file a written assessment of the offender with the court. If a court imposes treatment and recovery support services as a community control sanction, the court shall direct the level and type of treatment and recovery support services after consideration of the written assessment, if available at the time of sentencing, and recommendations of the professional and other treatment and recovery support services providers. (4) If an assessment completed pursuant to division (A)(3) of this section indicates that the offender has an addiction to drugs or alcohol, the court may include in any community control sanction imposed for a violation of section 2925.02, 2925.03, 2925.04, 2925.05, 2925.06, 2925.11, 2925.13, 2925.22, 2925.23, 2925.36, or 2925.37 of the Revised Code a requirement that the offender participate in alcohol and drug addiction services and recovery supports certified under section 5119.36 of the Revised Code or offered by a properly credentialed community addiction services provider. (B)(1) Except as provided in division (B)(2)(B)(3) of this section, if the conditions of a community control sanction imposed for a felony are violated or if the offender violates a law or leaves the state without the permission of the court or the offender's probation officer, the sentencing court may impose on the violator one or more of the following penalties: (a) A Subject to division (B)(1)(g) of this section, a longer time under the same sanction if the total time under the sanctions does not exceed the five-year limit specified in division (A) of this sectionthe applicable limit in division (A) of this section; (b) A Subject to division (B)(1)(g) of this section, a more restrictive sanction under section 2929.16, 2929.17, or 2929.18 of the Revised Code, including but not limited to, a new term in a community-based correctional facility, halfway house, or jail pursuant to division (A)(6) of section 2929.16 of the Revised Code; (c) A If the offender is serving the community control sanction for any felony of the third, fourth, or fifth degree, and subject to divisions (B)(1)(f) and (g) of this section, a term of not more than one year under the same sanction if the total time under the sanction does not exceed five years, and if the court finds all of the following: (i) The offender, while serving the projected last twelve months of the offender's community control sanction, violates the conditions of the sanction, other than a technical violation; (ii) The imposition of the term is necessary so that the offender may participate in a specialized docket program, programming in a community-based correctional facility or halfway house, or other specified program, the duration of which is longer than the remaining time on community control; (iii) The imposition of the term will reduce the risk of the offender reoffending. (d) If the offender is serving the community control sanction for any felony of the third, fourth, or fifth degree, and subject to divisions (B)(1)(f) and (g) of this section, a term of not more than one year under the same sanction if the total time under the sanction does not exceed five years and the court conducts a hearing and finds either of the following: (i) In the six months prior to the hearing, the offender has consistently demonstrated a willful refusal to comply with required mental or behavioral health treatment imposed as a condition of the community control sanction, and the court cannot appropriately respond in the remaining period of the community control sanction; (ii) The offender is required to complete programming as a condition of the community control sanction, and has not completed the programming at the conclusion of the initial supervision term. (e) If the offender is serving the community control sanction for any felony of the third, fourth, or fifth degree, and is required to pay restitution pursuant to section 2929.18 or 2929.281 of the Revised Code, subject to division (B)(2) of this section, a longer time under the same sanction if the total time under the sanction does not exceed the time required for the offender to complete the restitution payments or five years, whichever is less, if the court conducts a hearing and finds all of the following: (i) The offender has consistently demonstrated a willful refusal to pay restitution imposed as a condition of the community control sanction; (ii) The offender has the ability to pay restitution without suffering an undue financial burden; (iii) The civil remedies and procedures described in division (D) of section 2929.18 of the Revised Code are insufficient to allow the victim of the offender's criminal offense or the victim's estate to recover restitution after the period of the community control sanction has terminated. (f) Subject to division (B)(1)(g) of this section, a prison term on the offender pursuant to section 2929.14 of the Revised Code and division (B)(3)(B)(4) of this section, provided that a prison term imposed under this division is subject to the following limitations and rules, as applicable: (i) If the prison term is imposed under authority of division (B)(1)(g)(i)(IV) of this section for any fourth or subsequent technical violation of the conditions of a community control sanction imposed for a felony of the fifth degree, the prison term shall not exceed ninety days, provided that if the remaining period of community control at the time of the violation or the remaining period of the reserved prison sentence at that time is less than ninety days, the prison term shall not exceed the length of the remaining period of community control or the remaining period of the reserved prison sentence. If the court imposes a prison term as described in this division, division (B)(2)(b)(B)(3)(b) of this section applies. (ii) If the prison term is imposed under authority of division (B)(1)(g)(i)(IV) of this section for any a fourth or subsequent technical violation of the conditions of a community control sanction imposed for a felony of the fourth degree that is not an offense of violence and is not a sexually oriented offense, the prison term shall not exceed one hundred eighty days, provided that if the remaining period of the community control at the time of the violation or the remaining period of the reserved prison sentence at that time is less than one hundred eighty days, the prison term shall not exceed the length of the remaining period of community control or the remaining period of the reserved prison sentence. If the court imposes a prison term as described in this division, division (B)(2)(b)(B)(3)(b) of this section applies. (iii) A court is not limited in the number of times it may sentence an offender to a prison term under division (B)(1)(c) (B)(1)(f) of this section for a violation of the conditions of a community control sanction or for a violation of a law or leaving the state without the permission of the court or the offender's probation officer. If an offender who is under a community control sanction violates the conditions of the sanction or violates a law or leaves the state without the permission of the court or the offender's probation officer, is sentenced to a prison term for the violation or conduct, is released from the term after serving it, and subsequently violates the conditions of the sanction or violates a law or leaves the state without the permission of the court or the offender's probation officer, the court may impose a new prison term sanction on the offender under division (B)(1)(c)(B)(1)(f) of this section for the subsequent violation or conduct. (g) If the conditions of the community control sanction imposed for a felony are violated by a technical violation, one or more of the following penalties: (i) A more restrictive sanction under section 2929.17 of the Revised Code; (ii) A temporary incarceration sanction consisting of whichever of the following is applicable: (I) For a first technical violation during the period of community control that includes the violated sanction, a sanction of jail incarceration of not more than fifteen days or a sanction of a term in a community-based correctional facility, halfway house, or alternative residential facility of not more than one hundred eighty days; (II) For a second technical violation during the period of community control that includes the violated sanction, a sanction of jail incarceration of not more than thirty days or a sanction of a term in a community-based correctional facility, halfway house, or alternative residential facility of not more than one hundred eighty days; (III) For a third technical violation during the period of community control that includes the violated sanction, a sanction of jail incarceration of not more than forty-five days or a sanction of a term in a community-based correctional facility, halfway house, or alternative residential facility of not more than one hundred eighty days; (IV) For a fourth or subsequent technical violation during the period of community control that includes the violated sanction, any sanction of temporary incarceration described in divisions (B)(1)(a) to (f) of this section. (2)(a) A court is not limited in the number of times it may sentence an offender to a term described in division (B)(1)(c), (d), or (e) of this section, if the total time under the sanction does not exceed five years and if the court makes the required findings. (b) If the court imposes a term described in division (B)(1)(d) of this section, the offender shall not be subject to any conditions of supervision under the community control sanction except for complying with mental or behavioral health treatment or completing required programming during the extended term. If the court imposes a term described in division (B)(1)(e) of this section, the offender shall not be subject to any conditions of supervision under the community control sanction except for payment of restitution during the extended term. (c) If the court imposes a sanction of jail incarceration described in division (B)(1)(g) of this section, the sanction may be served in intermittent confinement, overnight, on weekends, or at any other time that will allow the offender to continue at the offender's occupation or care for the offender's family. (d) If the court imposes a sanction of jail incarceration described in division (B)(1)(g) of this section, the court may suspend the sanction if the offender knowingly and voluntarily agrees to comply with inpatient or outpatient mental or behavioral treatment, including substance abuse treatment, for a period of thirty to one hundred eighty days as determined by the court. If the offender successfully completes the inpatient or outpatient mental or behavioral health treatment, the sanction shall be terminated. If the offender does not successfully complete the mental or behavioral health treatment, the sanction shall be reimposed. (2)(a)(3)(a) If an offender was acting pursuant to division (B)(2)(b) of section 2925.11 or a related provision of section 2925.12, 2925.14, or 2925.141 of the Revised Code and in so doing violated the conditions of a community control sanction based on a minor drug possession offense, as defined in section 2925.11 of the Revised Code, or violated section 2925.12, division (C)(1) of section 2925.14, or section 2925.141 of the Revised Code, the sentencing court shall not impose any of the penalties described in division (B)(1) of this section based on the violation. (b) If a court imposes a prison term on an offender under division (B)(1)(c)(i) or (ii)(B)(1)(f)(i) or (ii) of this section for a technical violation of the conditions of a community control sanction, one of the following is applicable with respect to the time that the offender spends in prison under the term: (i) Subject to division (B)(2)(b)(ii)(B)(3)(b)(ii) of this section, it shall be credited against the offender's community control sanction that was being served at the time of the violation, and the remaining time under that community control sanction shall be reduced by the time that the offender spends in prison under the prison term. By determination of the court, the offender upon release from the prison term either shall continue serving the remaining time under the community control sanction, as reduced under this division, or shall have the community control sanction terminated. (ii) If, at the time a prison term is imposed for a technical violation, the offender was serving a residential community control sanction imposed under section 2929.16 of the Revised Code, the time spent serving the residential community control sanction shall be credited against the offender's reserved prison sentence, and the remaining time under that residential community control sanction and under the reserved prison sentence shall be reduced by the time that the offender spends in prison under the prison term. By determination of the court, the offender upon release from the prison term either shall continue serving the remaining time under the residential community control sanction, as reduced under this division, or shall have the residential community control sanction terminated. (3)(4) The prison term, if any, imposed on a violator pursuant to this division and division (B)(1) of this section shall be within the range of prison terms described in this division and shall not exceed a prison term from the range of terms specified in the notice provided to the offender at the sentencing hearing pursuant to division (B)(4) of section 2929.19 of the Revised Code. The court may reduce the longer period of time that the offender is required to spend under the longer sanction, the more restrictive sanction, temporary incarceration, or a prison term imposed pursuant to division (B)(1) of this section by the time the offender successfully spent under the sanction that was initially imposed. Except as otherwise specified in this division, the prison term imposed under this division and division (B)(1) of this section shall be within the range of prison terms available as a definite term for the offense for which the sanction that was violated was imposed. If the offense for which the sanction that was violated was imposed is a felony of the first or second degree committed on or after March 22, 2019, the prison term so imposed under this division shall be within the range of prison terms available as a minimum term for the offense under division (A)(1)(a) or (2)(a) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code. (C) If an offender, for a significant period of time, fulfills the conditions of a sanction imposed pursuant to section 2929.16, 2929.17, or 2929.18 of the Revised Code in an exemplary manner, the court may reduce the period of time under the sanction or impose a less restrictive sanction, but the court shall not permit the offender to violate any law or permit the offender to leave the state without the permission of the court or the offender's probation officer. (D)(1) Within sixty days after an offender completes two years of the conditions of a sanction imposed pursuant to section 2929.16, 2929.17, or 2929.18 of the Revised Code the court shall determine whether the following apply: (a) The offender is serving the community control sanction for any felony of the third, fourth, or fifth degree. (b) The offender has not violated the conditions of the community control sanction in the six months prior to the court's determination. (c) The offender has completed all programs required as a condition of the community control sanction or, if applicable, the offender has successfully earned a qualifying diploma, degree, or license. (2)(a) If the court determines that all of the conditions listed in division (D)(1) of this section apply and that the termination will not present a risk of serious physical harm to a person, the court shall terminate the community control sanction and is not required to conduct a hearing. (b) If the court does not terminate the community control sanction under division (D)(2)(a) of this section, the court shall schedule a hearing and shall notify the offender and prosecutor for the case of the hearing. The prosecutor shall provide timely notice of the hearing to the victim and victim's representative, if applicable. The court shall hold the hearing not less than thirty days after the date the court makes the determinations described in division (D)(1) of this section and at the hearing shall determine whether the factors in division (D)(1) of this section are met and whether termination of the sanction presents a serious risk of physical harm to a person. If the court, pursuant to the hearing, determines that the factors in division (D)(1) of this section are met and that termination of the sanction does not present a serious risk of physical harm to a person, the court shall terminate the sanction. (E)(1) If a court under division (A)(1) of this section imposes a condition of release under a community control sanction that requires the offender to submit to random drug testing, the department of probation, the adult parole authority, or any other entity that has general control and supervision of the offender under division (A)(2)(a) of this section may cause the offender to submit to random drug testing performed by a laboratory or entity that has entered into a contract with any of the governmental entities or officers authorized to enter into a contract with that laboratory or entity under section 341.26, 753.33, or 5120.63 of the Revised Code. (2) If no laboratory or entity described in division (D)(1)(E)(1) of this section has entered into a contract as specified in that division, the department of probation, the adult parole authority, or any other entity that has general control and supervision of the offender under division (A)(2)(a) of this section shall cause the offender to submit to random drug testing performed by a reputable public laboratory to determine whether the individual who is the subject of the drug test ingested or was injected with a drug of abuse. (3) A laboratory or entity that has entered into a contract pursuant to section 341.26, 753.33, or 5120.63 of the Revised Code shall perform the random drug tests under division (D)(1)(E)(1) of this section in accordance with the applicable standards that are included in the terms of that contract. A public laboratory shall perform the random drug tests under division (D)(2)(E)(2) of this section in accordance with the standards set forth in the policies and procedures established by the department of rehabilitation and correction pursuant to section 5120.63 of the Revised Code. An offender who is required under division (A)(1) of this section to submit to random drug testing as a condition of release under a community control sanction and whose test results indicate that the offender ingested or was injected with a drug of abuse shall pay the fee for the drug test if the department of probation, the adult parole authority, or any other entity that has general control and supervision of the offender requires payment of a fee. A laboratory or entity that performs the random drug testing on an offender under division (D)(1)(E)(1) or (2) of this section shall transmit the results of the drug test to the appropriate department of probation, the adult parole authority, or any other entity that has general control and supervision of the offender under division (A)(2)(a) of this section. (E)(F) As used in this section, "technical violation" means a violation of the conditions of a community control sanction imposed for a felony of the fifth degree, or for a felony of the fourth degree that is not an offense of violence and is not a sexually oriented offense, and to which neither of the following applies: (1) The violation consists of a new criminal offense that is a felony or that is a misdemeanor other than a minor misdemeanor, and the violation is committed while under the community control sanction. (2) The violation consists of or includes the offender's articulated or demonstrated refusal to participate in the community control sanction imposed on the offender or any of its conditions, and the refusal demonstrates to the court that the offender has abandoned the objects of the community control sanction or condition. Sec. 2929.20. (A) As used in this section: (1)(a) Except as provided in division (A)(1)(b) of this section, "eligible offender" means any person who, on or after April 7, 2009, is serving a stated prison term that includes one or more nonmandatory prison terms. A person may be an eligible offender and also may be an eighty per cent-qualifying offender or, during a declared state of emergency, a state of emergency-qualifying offender. (b) "Eligible offender" does not include any person who, on or after April 7, 2009, is serving a stated prison term for any of the following criminal offenses that was a felony and was committed while the person held a public office in this state: (i) A violation of section 2921.02, 2921.03, 2921.05, 2921.31, 2921.32, 2921.41, 2921.42, or 2923.32 of the Revised Code; (ii) A violation of section 2913.42, 2921.04, 2921.11, or 2921.12 of the Revised Code, when the conduct constituting the violation was related to the duties of the offender's public office or to the offender's actions as a public official holding that public office; (iii) A violation of an existing or former municipal ordinance or law of this or any other state or the United States that is substantially equivalent to any violation listed in division (A)(1)(b)(i) of this section; (iv) A violation of an existing or former municipal ordinance or law of this or any other state or the United States that is substantially equivalent to any violation listed in division (A)(1)(b)(ii) of this section, when the conduct constituting the violation was related to the duties of the offender's public office or to the offender's actions as a public official holding that public office; (v) A conspiracy to commit, attempt to commit, or complicity in committing any offense listed in division (A)(1)(b)(i) or described in division (A)(1)(b)(iii) of this section; (vi) A conspiracy to commit, attempt to commit, or complicity in committing any offense listed in division (A)(1)(b)(ii) or described in division (A)(1)(b)(iv) of this section, if the conduct constituting the offense that was the subject of the conspiracy, that would have constituted the offense attempted, or constituting the offense in which the offender was complicit was or would have been related to the duties of the offender's public office or to the offender's actions as a public official holding that public office. (2) "State of emergency-qualifying offender" means any inmate to whom all of the following apply: (a) The inmate is serving a stated prison term during a state of emergency that is declared by the governor as a direct response to a pandemic or public health emergency. (b) The geographical area covered by the declared state of emergency includes the location at which the inmate is serving the stated prison term described in division (A)(2)(a) of this section. (c) There is a direct nexus between the emergency that is the basis of the governor's declaration of the state of emergency and the circumstances of, and need for release of, the inmate. (3)(a) "Eighty per cent-qualifying offender" means an offender who is serving a stated prison term of one year or more, on or after April 4, 2023, who has commenced service of that stated prison term, who is not serving a stated prison term that includes a disqualifying prison term or a stated prison term that consists solely of one or more restricting prison terms, and to whom either of the following applies: (i) If the offender is serving a stated prison term of one year or more that includes one or more restricting prison terms and one or more eligible prison terms, the offender has fully served all restricting prison terms and has served eighty per cent of that stated prison term that remains to be served after all restricting prison terms have been fully served. (ii) If the offender is serving a stated prison term of one year or more that consists solely of one or more eligible prison terms, the offender has served eighty per cent of that stated prison term. (b) For purposes of determining whether an offender is an eighty per cent-qualifying offender under division (A)(3)(a) of this section: (i) If the offender's stated prison term includes consecutive prison terms, any restricting prison terms shall be deemed served prior to any eligible prison terms that run consecutively to the restricting prison terms, and the eligible prison terms are deemed to commence after all of the restricting prison terms have been fully served. (ii) An offender serving a stated prison term of one year or more that includes a mandatory prison term that is not a disqualifying prison term and is not a restricting prison term is not automatically disqualified from being an eighty per cent-qualifying offender as a result of the offender's service of that mandatory term for release from prison under this section, and the offender may be eligible for release from prison in accordance with this division and division (O) of this section. (4) "Nonmandatory prison term" means a prison term that is not a mandatory prison term. (5) "Public office" means any elected federal, state, or local government office in this state. (6) "Victim's representative" has the same meaning as in section 2930.01 of the Revised Code. (7) "Imminent danger of death," "medically incapacitated," and "terminal illness" have the same meanings as in section 2967.05 of the Revised Code. (8) "Aggregated nonmandatory prison term or terms" means the aggregate of the following: (a) All nonmandatory definite prison terms; (b) With respect to any non-life felony indefinite prison term, all nonmandatory minimum prison terms imposed as part of the non-life felony indefinite prison term or terms. (9) "Deadly weapon" and "dangerous ordnance" have the same meanings as in section 2923.11 of the Revised Code. (10) "Disqualifying prison term" means any of the following: (a) A prison term imposed for aggravated murder, murder, voluntary manslaughter, involuntary manslaughter, felonious assault, kidnapping, rape, aggravated arson, aggravated burglary, or aggravated robbery; (b) A prison term imposed for complicity in, an attempt to commit, or conspiracy to commit any offense listed in division (A)(10)(a) of this section; (c) A prison term of life imprisonment, including any term of life imprisonment that has parole eligibility; (d) A prison term imposed for any felony other than carrying a concealed weapon an essential element of which is any conduct or failure to act expressly involving any deadly weapon or dangerous ordnance; (e) A prison term imposed for any violation of section 2925.03 of the Revised Code that is a felony of the first or second degree; (f) A prison term imposed for engaging in a pattern of corrupt activity in violation of section 2923.32 of the Revised Code; (g) A prison term imposed pursuant to section 2971.03 of the Revised Code; (h) A prison term imposed for any sexually oriented offense. (11) "Eligible prison term" means any prison term that is not a disqualifying prison term and is not a restricting prison term. (12) "Restricting prison term" means any of the following: (a) A mandatory prison term imposed under division (B)(1)(a), (B)(1)(c), (B)(1)(f), (B)(1)(g), (B)(2), or (B)(7) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code for a specification of the type described in that division; (b) In the case of an offender who has been sentenced to a mandatory prison term for a specification of the type described in division (A)(12)(a) of this section, the prison term imposed for the felony offense for which the specification was stated at the end of the body of the indictment, count in the indictment, or information charging the offense; (c) A prison term imposed for trafficking in persons; (d) A prison term imposed for any offense that is described in division (A)(12)(d)(i) of this section if division (A)(12)(d)(ii) of this section applies to the offender: (i) The offense is a felony of the first or second degree that is an offense of violence and that is not described in division (A)(10)(a) or (b) of this section, an attempt to commit a felony of the first or second degree that is an offense of violence and that is not described in division (A)(10)(a) or (b) of this section if the attempt is a felony of the first or second degree, or an offense under an existing or former law of this state, another state, or the United States that is or was substantially equivalent to any other offense described in this division. (ii) The offender previously was convicted of or pleaded guilty to any offense listed in division (A)(10) or (A)(12)(d)(i) of this section. (13) "Sexually oriented offense" has the same meaning as in section 2950.01 of the Revised Code. (14) "Stated prison term of one year or more" means a definite prison term of one year or more imposed as a stated prison term, or a minimum prison term of one year or more imposed as part of a stated prison term that is a non-life felony indefinite prison term. (B) On the motion of an eligible offender, on the motion of a state of emergency-qualifying offender made during the declared state of emergency, or on its own motion with respect to an eligible offender or with respect to a state of emergency-qualifying offender during the declared state of emergency, the sentencing court may reduce the offender's aggregated nonmandatory prison term or terms through a judicial release under this section. (C)(1) Subject to division (C)(2) of this section, an eligible offender may file a motion for judicial release with the sentencing court, or a state of emergency-qualifying offender may file a motion for judicial release with the sentencing court during the declared state of emergency, within the following applicable periods: (a) If the aggregated nonmandatory prison term or terms is less than two years, the eligible offender or state of emergency-qualifying offender may file the motion at any time after the offender is delivered to a state correctional institution or, if the prison term includes a mandatory prison term or terms, at any time after the expiration of all mandatory prison terms. (b) If the aggregated nonmandatory prison term or terms is at least two years but less than five years, the eligible offender or state of emergency-qualifying offender may file the motion not earlier than one hundred eighty days after the offender is delivered to a state correctional institution or, if the prison term includes a mandatory prison term or terms, not earlier than one hundred eighty days after the expiration of all mandatory prison terms. (c) If the aggregated nonmandatory prison term or terms is five years, the eligible offender or state of emergency-qualifying offender may file the motion not earlier than the date on which the offender has served four years of the offender's stated prison term or, if the prison term includes a mandatory prison term or terms, not earlier than four years after the expiration of all mandatory prison terms. (d) If the aggregated nonmandatory prison term or terms is more than five years but not more than ten years, the eligible offender or state of emergency-qualifying offender may file the motion not earlier than the date on which the offender has served five years of the offender's stated prison term or, if the prison term includes a mandatory prison term or terms, not earlier than five years after the expiration of all mandatory prison terms. (e) If the aggregated nonmandatory prison term or terms is more than ten years, the eligible offender or state of emergency-qualifying offender may file the motion not earlier than the later of the date on which the offender has served one-half of the offender's stated prison term or the date specified in division (C)(1)(d) of this section. (f) With respect to a state of emergency-qualifying offender, if the offender's prison term does not include a mandatory prison term or terms, or if the offender's prison term includes one or more mandatory prison terms and the offender has completed the mandatory prison term or terms, the state of emergency-qualifying offender may file the motion at any time during the offender's aggregated nonmandatory prison term or terms, provided that time also is during the declared state of emergency. (2) During any single declared state of emergency, a state of emergency-qualifying offender may only file a motion for judicial release as a state of emergency-qualifying offender with the sentencing court during that declared state of emergency once every six months. (D)(1)(a) Upon receipt of a timely motion for judicial release filed by an eligible offender or a state of emergency-qualifying offender under division (C) of this section, or upon the sentencing court's own motion made within the appropriate time specified in that division, the court may deny the motion without a hearing or schedule a hearing on the motion. The court may grant the motion without a hearing for an offender under consideration for judicial release as a state of emergency-qualifying offender, but the court shall not grant the motion without a hearing for an offender under consideration as an eligible offender. If a court denies a motion without a hearing, the court later may consider judicial release for that eligible offender or that state of emergency-qualifying offender on a subsequent motion. For an offender under consideration for judicial release as an eligible offender, but not for one under consideration as a state of emergency-qualifying offender, the court may deny the motion with prejudice. If a court denies a motion with prejudice, the court may later consider judicial release on its own motion. For an offender under consideration for judicial release as a state of emergency-qualifying offender, the court shall not deny a motion with prejudice. For an offender under consideration for judicial release as an eligible offender, but not for one under consideration as a state of emergency-qualifying offender, if a court denies a motion after a hearing, the court shall not consider a subsequent motion for that offender based on the offender's classification as an eligible offender. The court may hold multiple hearings for any offender under consideration for judicial release as a state of emergency-qualifying offender, but shall hold only one hearing for any offender under consideration as an eligible offender. (b) If an offender is under consideration for judicial release as an eligible offender and the motion is denied, and if the offender at that time also is or subsequently becomes a state of emergency-qualifying offender, the denial does not limit or affect any right of the offender to file a motion under this section for consideration for judicial release as a state of emergency-qualifying offender or for the court on its own motion to consider the offender for judicial release as a state of emergency-qualifying offender. If an offender is under consideration for judicial release as a state of emergency-qualifying offender and the motion is denied, and if the offender at that time also is or subsequently becomes an eligible offender, the denial does not limit or affect any right of the offender to file a motion under this section for consideration for judicial release as an eligible offender or for the court on its own motion to consider the offender for judicial release as an eligible offender. (2)(a) With respect to a motion for judicial release filed by an offender as an eligible offender or made by the court on its own motion for an offender as an eligible offender, a hearing under this section shall be conducted in open court not less than thirty or more than sixty days after the motion is filed, provided that the court may delay the hearing for one hundred eighty additional days. If the court holds a hearing, the court shall enter a ruling on the motion within ten days after the hearing. If the court denies the motion without a hearing, the court shall enter its ruling on the motion within sixty days after the motion is filed. (b) With respect to a motion for judicial release filed by an offender as a state of emergency-qualifying offender or made by the court on its own motion for an offender as a state of emergency-qualifying offender, the court shall notify the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the offender was indicted and may order the prosecuting attorney to respond to the motion in writing within ten days. The prosecuting attorney shall notify the victim pursuant to the Ohio Constitution. The prosecuting attorney shall include in the response any statement that the victim wants to be represented to the court. The court shall consider any response from the prosecuting attorney and any statement from the victim in its ruling on the motion. After receiving the response from the prosecuting attorney, the court either shall order a hearing consistent with divisions (E) to (I) of this section as soon as possible, or shall enter its ruling on the motion for judicial release as soon as possible. If the court conducts a hearing, the hearing shall be conducted in open court or by a virtual, telephonic, or other form of remote hearing. If the court holds a hearing, the court shall enter a ruling on the motion within ten days after the hearing. If the court denies the motion without a hearing, the court shall enter its ruling on the motion within ten days after the motion is filed or after it receives the response from the prosecuting attorney. (E) If a court schedules a hearing under divisions (D)(1) and (2)(a) of this section or under divisions (D)(1) and (2)(b) of this section, the court shall notify the subject eligible offender or state of emergency-qualifying offender and the head of the state correctional institution in which that subject offender is confined prior to the hearing. The head of the state correctional institution immediately shall notify the appropriate person at the department of rehabilitation and correction of the hearing, and the department within twenty-four hours after receipt of the notice, shall post on the database it maintains pursuant to section 5120.66 of the Revised Code the subject offender's name and all of the information specified in division (A)(1)(c)(i) of that section. If the court schedules a hearing for judicial release, the court promptly shall give notice of the hearing to the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the subject eligible offender or state of emergency-qualifying offender was indicted. Upon receipt of the notice from the court, the prosecuting attorney shall do whichever of the following is applicable: (1) Subject to division (E)(2) of this section, notify the victim of the offense and the victim's representative, if applicable, pursuant to the Ohio Constitution and division (B) of section 2930.16 of the Revised Code; (2) If the offense was an offense of violence that is a felony of the first, second, or third degree, except as otherwise provided in this division, pursuant to the Ohio Constitution, notify the victim and the victim's representative, if applicable, of the hearing regardless of whether the victim or victim's representative has requested the notification. Except when notice to the victim is required under the Ohio Constitution, the notice of the hearing shall not be given under this division to a victim or victim's representative if the victim or victim's representative has requested pursuant to division (B)(2) of section 2930.03 of the Revised Code that the victim or the victim's representative not be provided the notice. If notice is to be provided to a victim or victim's representative under this division, the prosecuting attorney may give the notice by any reasonable means, including regular mail, telephone, and electronic mail, in accordance with division (D)(1) of section 2930.16 of the Revised Code. If the notice is based on an offense committed prior to March 22, 2013, the notice also shall include the opt-out information described in division (D)(1) of section 2930.16 of the Revised Code. The prosecuting attorney, in accordance with division (D)(2) of section 2930.16 of the Revised Code, shall keep a record of all attempts to provide the notice, and of all notices provided, under this division. Division (E)(2) of this section, and the notice-related provisions of division (K) of this section, division (D)(1) of section 2930.16, division (H) of section 2967.12, division (E)(1)(b) of section 2967.19 as it existed prior to April 4, 2023, division (A)(3)(b) of section 2967.26, division (D)(1) of section 2967.28, and division (A)(2) of section 5149.101 of the Revised Code enacted in the act in which division (E)(2) of this section was enacted, shall be known as "Roberta's Law." (F) Upon an offender's successful completion of rehabilitative activities, the head of the state correctional institution may notify the sentencing court of the successful completion of the activities. (G) Prior to the date of the hearing on a motion for judicial release made by an eligible offender, by a state of emergency-qualifying offender, or by a court on its own under this section, the head of the state correctional institution in which the subject offender is confined shall send to the court an institutional summary report on the offender's conduct in the institution and in any institution from which the offender may have been transferred. Upon the request of the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the subject offender was indicted or of any law enforcement agency, the head of the state correctional institution, at the same time the person sends the institutional summary report to the court, also shall send a copy of the report to the requesting prosecuting attorney and law enforcement agencies. The institutional summary report shall cover the subject offender's participation in school, vocational training, work, treatment, and other rehabilitative activities and any disciplinary action taken against the subject offender. The report shall be made part of the record of the hearing. A presentence investigation report is not required for judicial release. (H) If the court grants a hearing on a motion for judicial release made by an eligible offender, by a state of emergency-qualifying offender, or by a court on its own under this section, the subject offender shall attend the hearing if ordered to do so by the court. Upon receipt of a copy of the journal entry containing the order, the head of the state correctional institution in which the subject offender is incarcerated shall deliver the subject offender to the sheriff of the county in which the hearing is to be held. The sheriff shall convey the subject offender to and from the hearing. (I) At the hearing on a motion for judicial release under this section made by an eligible offender, by a state of emergency-qualifying offender, or by a court on its own, the court shall afford the subject offender and the offender's attorney an opportunity to present written and, if present, oral information relevant to the motion. The court shall afford a similar opportunity to the prosecuting attorney, the victim, the victim's representative, the victim's attorney, if applicable, and any other person the court determines is likely to present additional relevant information. The court shall consider any oral or written statement of a victim, victim's representative, and victim's attorney, if applicable, made pursuant to section 2930.14 or 2930.17 of the Revised Code, any victim impact statement prepared pursuant to section 2947.051 of the Revised Code, and any report made under division (G) of this section. The court may consider any written statement of any person submitted to the court pursuant to division (L) of this section. If the motion alleges that the offender who is the subject of the motion is an eligible offender and the court makes an initial determination that the offender satisfies the criteria for being an eligible offender, or if the motion alleges that the offender who is the subject of the motion is a state of emergency-qualifying offender and the court makes an initial determination that the offender satisfies the criteria for being a state of emergency-qualifying offender, the court shall determine whether to grant the motion. After ruling on the motion, the court shall notify the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the eligible offender or state of emergency-qualifying offender was indicted of the ruling, and the prosecuting attorney shall notify the victim and the victim's representative of the ruling in accordance with sections 2930.03 and 2930.16 of the Revised Code or, if the court granted the motion, in accordance with division (K) of this section. (J)(1) A court shall not grant a judicial release under this section to an offender who is imprisoned for a felony of the first or second degree and who is under consideration as an eligible offender, or to an offender who committed an offense under Chapter 2925. or 3719. of the Revised Code, who is under consideration as an eligible offender, and for whom there was a presumption under section 2929.13 of the Revised Code in favor of a prison term, unless the court, with reference to factors under section 2929.12 of the Revised Code, finds both of the following: (a) That a sanction other than a prison term would adequately punish the offender and protect the public from future criminal violations by the offender because the applicable factors indicating a lesser likelihood of recidivism outweigh the applicable factors indicating a greater likelihood of recidivism; (b) That a sanction other than a prison term would not demean the seriousness of the offense because factors indicating that the offender's conduct in committing the offense was less serious than conduct normally constituting the offense outweigh factors indicating that the eligible offender's conduct was more serious than conduct normally constituting the offense. (2) A court that grants a judicial release under division (J)(1) of this section to an offender who is under consideration as an eligible offender shall specify on the record both findings required in that division and also shall list all the factors described in that division that were presented at the hearing. (3)(a) Subject to division (J)(3)(b) of this section, a court shall grant a judicial release under this section to an offender who is under consideration as a state of emergency-qualifying offender if the court determines that the risks posed by incarceration to the health and safety of the offender, because of the nature of the declared state of emergency, outweigh the risk to public safety if the offender were to be released from incarceration. (b) A court shall not grant a judicial release under this section to an offender who is imprisoned for a felony of the first or second degree and is under consideration for judicial release as a state of emergency-qualifying offender unless the court, with reference to the factors specified under section 2929.12 of the Revised Code, finds both of the criteria set forth in divisions (J)(1)(a) and (b) of this section. (K)(K)(1) If the court grants a motion for judicial release under this section, the court shall order the release of the eligible offender or state of emergency-qualifying offender, shall place the offender under an appropriate community control sanction, under appropriate conditions, and under the supervision of the department of probation serving the court and shall reserve the right to reimpose the sentence that it reduced if the offender violates the sanction. If the court reimposes the reduced sentence, it may do so either concurrently with, or consecutive to, any new sentence imposed on the eligible offender or state of emergency-qualifying offender as a result of the violation that is a new offense. Except as provided in division (N)(5)(b) of this section and divisions (B)(1)(c) to (e) of section 2929.15 of the Revised Code, the period of community control shall be no longer than five years if the most serious offense from which the judicial release is granted is a felony of the first or second degree and no longer than three years if the most serious offense from which judicial release is granted is a felony of the third, fourth, or fifth degree. The court, in its discretion, may reduce the period of community control by the amount of time the offender spent in jail or prison for the offense and in prison. If the court made any findings pursuant to division (J)(1) of this section, the court shall serve a copy of the findings upon counsel for the parties within fifteen days after the date on which the court grants the motion for judicial release. (2) If the court grants a motion for judicial release, the court shall notify the appropriate person at the department of rehabilitation and correction, and the department shall post notice of the release on the database it maintains pursuant to section 5120.66 of the Revised Code. The court also shall notify the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the eligible offender or state of emergency-qualifying offender was indicted that the motion has been granted. When notice to the victim is required under the Ohio Constitution, the prosecuting attorney shall notify the victim and the victim's representative, if applicable, of the judicial release. In all other cases, unless the victim or the victim's representative has requested pursuant to division (B)(2) of section 2930.03 of the Revised Code that the victim or victim's representative not be provided the notice, the prosecuting attorney shall notify the victim and the victim's representative, if applicable, of the judicial release in any manner, and in accordance with the same procedures, pursuant to which the prosecuting attorney is authorized to provide notice of the hearing pursuant to division (E)(2) of this section. If the notice is based on an offense committed prior to March 22, 2013, the notice to the victim or victim's representative also shall include the opt-out information described in division (D)(1) of section 2930.16 of the Revised Code. (L) In addition to and independent of the right of a victim to make a statement pursuant to section 2930.14, 2930.17, or 2946.051 of the Revised Code and any right of a person to present written information or make a statement pursuant to division (I) of this section, any person may submit to the court, at any time prior to the hearing on the motion for judicial release of the eligible offender or state of emergency-qualifying offender, a written statement concerning the effects of the offender's criminal offense, the circumstances surrounding the criminal offense, the manner in which the criminal offense was perpetrated, and the person's opinion as to whether the offender should be released. (M)(1) The changes to this section that are made on September 30, 2011, apply to any judicial release decision made on or after September 30, 2011, for any eligible offender, subject to division (M)(2) of this section. (2) The changes to this section that are made on April 4, 2023, apply to any judicial release application, and any judicial release decision, made on or after April 4, 2023, for any eligible offender or state of emergency-qualifying offender. (N)(1) Notwithstanding the eligibility requirements specified in divisions (A)(1) and (2) of this section and the filing time frames specified in division (C) of this section and notwithstanding the findings required under division (J)(1) and the eligibility criteria specified in division (J)(3) of this section, the sentencing court, upon the court's own motion and after considering whether the release of the offender into society would create undue risk to public safety, may grant a judicial release to an offender who is not serving a life sentence at any time during the offender's imposed sentence when the director of rehabilitation and correction certifies to the sentencing court through the chief medical officer for the department of rehabilitation and correction that the offender is in imminent danger of death, is medically incapacitated, or has a terminal illness. (2) The director of rehabilitation and correction shall not certify any offender under division (N)(1) of this section who is serving a death sentence. (3) A motion made by the court under division (N)(1) of this section is subject to the notice, hearing, and other procedural requirements specified in divisions (D), (E), (G), (H), (I), (K), and (L) of this section with respect to motions for a grant of judicial release to eligible offenders, including notice to the victim, except for the following: (a) The court may waive the offender's appearance at any hearing scheduled by the court if the offender's condition makes it impossible for the offender to participate meaningfully in the proceeding. (b) The court may grant the motion without a hearing, provided that the prosecuting attorney, victim, and victim's representative, if applicable, to whom notice of the hearing was provided under division (E) of this section indicate that they do not wish to participate in the hearing or present information relevant to the motion. (4) The court may request health care records from the department of rehabilitation and correction to verify the certification made under division (N)(1) of this section. (5)(a) If the court grants judicial release under division (N)(1) of this section, the court shall do all of the following: (i) Order the release of the offender; (ii) Place the offender under an appropriate community control sanction, under appropriate conditions; (iii) Place the offender under the supervision of the department of probation serving the court or under the supervision of the adult parole authority. (b) The court, in its discretion, may revoke the judicial release if the offender violates the community control sanction described in division (N)(5)(a) of this section. The period of that community control is not subject to the five-year limitation limitations on duration described in division (K) of this section and shall not expire earlier than the date on which all of the offender's mandatory prison terms expire. (6) If the health of an offender who is released under division (N)(1) of this section improves so that the offender is no longer terminally ill, medically incapacitated, or in imminent danger of death, the court shall, upon the court's own motion, revoke the judicial release. The court shall not grant the motion without a hearing unless the offender waives a hearing. If a hearing is held, the court shall afford the offender and the offender's attorney an opportunity to present written and, if the offender or the offender's attorney is present, oral information relevant to the motion. The court shall afford a similar opportunity to the prosecuting attorney, the victim, the victim's representative, the victim's attorney, if applicable, and any other person the court determines is likely to present additional relevant information. If a hearing is held, the prosecuting attorney shall notify the victim and the victim's representative, if applicable, pursuant to the Ohio Constitution. A court that grants a motion under this division shall specify its findings on the record. (O)(1) Separate from and independent of the provisions of divisions (A) to (N) of this section, the director of the department of rehabilitation and correction may recommend in writing to the sentencing court that the court consider releasing from prison, through a judicial release, any offender who is confined in a state correctional institution and who is an eighty per cent-qualifying offender. The director may file such a recommendation for judicial release by submitting to the sentencing court a notice, in writing, of the recommendation within the applicable period specified in division (A)(3) of this section for qualifying as an eighty per cent-qualifying offender. The director shall include with any notice submitted to the sentencing court under this division an institutional summary report that covers the offender's participation while confined in a state correctional institution in school, training, work, treatment, and other rehabilitative activities and any disciplinary action taken against the offender while so confined. The director shall include with the notice any other documentation requested by the court, if available. If the director submits a notice under this division recommending judicial release, the department promptly shall provide to the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the offender was indicted a copy of the written notice and recommendation, a copy of the institutional summary report, and any other information provided to the court, and shall provide a copy of the institutional summary report to any law enforcement agency that requests the report. The department also shall provide written notice of the submission of the director's notice to any victim of the offender or victim's representative, if applicable, in the same manner as is specified in divisions (E)(1) and (2) of this section with respect to notices of hearings. (2) A recommendation for judicial release in a notice submitted by the director under division (O)(1) of this section is subject to the notice, hearing, and other procedural requirements specified in divisions (E), (H), (I), and (L) of this section, including notice to the victim pursuant to the Ohio Constitution, except as otherwise specified in divisions (O)(3) to (5) of this section, provided that references in divisions (E), (H), (I), (K), and (L) of this section to "the motion" shall be construed for purposes of division (O) of this section as being references to the notice and recommendation specified in division (O)(1) of this section. (3) The director's submission of a notice under division (O)(1) of this section constitutes a recommendation by the director that the court strongly consider a judicial release of the offender consistent with the purposes and principles of sentencing set forth in sections 2929.11 and 2929.13 of the Revised Code and establishes a rebuttable presumption that the offender shall be released through a judicial release in accordance with the recommendation. The presumption of release may be rebutted only as described in division (O)(6) of this section. Only an offender recommended by the director under division (O)(1) of this section may be considered for a judicial release under division (O) of this section. (4) Upon receipt of a notice recommending judicial release submitted by the director under division (O)(1) of this section, the court shall schedule a hearing to consider the recommendation for the judicial release of the offender who is the subject of the notice. The hearing shall be conducted in open court not less than thirty or more than sixty days after the notice is submitted. The court shall inform the department and the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the offender who is the subject of the notice was indicted of the date, time, and location of the hearing. Upon receipt of the notice from the court, the prosecuting attorney shall comply with division (E) of this section, including providing notice to the victim and the victim's representative, if applicable, pursuant to the Ohio Constitution, and the department shall post the information specified in that division. (5) When a court schedules a hearing under division (O)(4) of this section, at the hearing, the court shall consider all of the following in determining whether to grant the offender judicial release under division (O) of this section: (a) The institutional summary report submitted under division (O)(1) of this section; (b) The inmate's academic, vocational education programs, or alcohol or drug treatment programs; or involvement in meaningful activity; (c) The inmate's assignments and whether the inmate consistently performed each work assignment to the satisfaction of the department staff responsible for supervising the inmate's work; (d) The inmate transferred to and actively participated in core curriculum programming at a reintegration center prison; (e) The inmate's disciplinary history; (f) The inmate's security level; (g) All other information, statements, reports, and documentation described in division (I) of this section. (6) If the court that receives a notice recommending judicial release submitted by the director under division (O)(1) of this section makes an initial determination that the offender satisfies the criteria for being an eighty per cent-qualifying offender, the court then shall determine whether to grant the offender judicial release. In making the second determination, the court shall grant the offender judicial release unless the prosecuting attorney proves to the court, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the legitimate interests of the government in maintaining the offender's confinement outweigh the interests of the offender in being released from that confinement. If the court grants a judicial release under this division, division (K) of this section applies regarding the judicial release, including the maximums specified in that division for the duration of the period of all community control sanctions imposed on the offender under that division and the notice to the victim and the victim's representative, if applicable, pursuant to the Ohio Constitution, provided that references in division (K) of this section to "the motion" shall be construed for purposes of the judicial release granted under this division as being references to the notice and recommendation specified in division (O)(1) of this section. The court shall enter its ruling on the notice recommending judicial release submitted by the director under division (O)(1) of this section within ten days after the hearing is conducted. After ruling on whether to grant the offender judicial release under division (O) of this section, the court shall notify the offender, the prosecuting attorney, and the department of rehabilitation and correction of its decision, and shall notify the victim of its decision in accordance with the Ohio Constitution and sections 2930.03 and 2930.16 of the Revised Code. If the court does not enter a ruling on the notice within ten days after the hearing is conducted as required under this division, the division of parole and community services of the department of rehabilitation and correction may release the offender. (P) All notices to a victim of an offense provided under division (D), (E), (K), (N), or (O) of this section shall be provided in accordance with the Ohio Constitution. Sec. 2929.25. (A)(1) Except as provided in sections 2929.22 and 2929.23 of the Revised Code or when a jail term is required by law, in sentencing an offender for a misdemeanor, other than a minor misdemeanor, the sentencing court may do either of the following: (a) Directly impose a sentence that consists of one or more community control sanctions authorized by section 2929.26, 2929.27, or 2929.28 of the Revised Code. The court may impose any other conditions of release under a community control sanction that the court considers appropriate. If the court imposes a jail term upon the offender, the court may impose any community control sanction or combination of community control sanctions in addition to the jail term. (b) Impose a jail term under section 2929.24 of the Revised Code from the range of jail terms authorized under that section for the offense, suspend all or a portion of the jail term imposed, and place the offender under a community control sanction or combination of community control sanctions authorized under section 2929.26, 2929.27, or 2929.28 of the Revised Code. (2) The Except as provided in divisions (D)(2)(d) and (e) and division (D)(3) of this section, the duration of all community control sanctions imposed upon an offender and in effect for an offender at any time shall not exceed five three years. (3) At sentencing, if a court directly imposes a community control sanction or combination of community control sanctions pursuant to division (A)(1)(a) or (B) of this section, the court shall state the duration of the community control sanctions imposed and shall notify the offender that if any of the conditions of the community control sanctions are violated the court may do any of the following: (a) Impose a longer time under the same community control sanction if the total time under all of the offender's community control sanctions does not exceed the five-year limit specified in division (A)(2) of this section, except as provided in divisions (D)(2)(d) and (e) and division (D)(3) of this section; (b) Impose a more restrictive community control sanction under section 2929.26, 2929.27, or 2929.28 of the Revised Code, but the court is not required to impose any particular sanction or sanctions; (c) Impose a definite jail term from the range of jail terms authorized for the offense under section 2929.24 of the Revised Code. (B) If a court sentences an offender to any community control sanction or combination of community control sanctions pursuant to division (A)(1)(a) of this section, the sentencing court retains jurisdiction over the offender and the period of community control for the duration of the period of community control. Upon the motion of either party or on the court's own motion, the court, in the court's sole discretion and as the circumstances warrant, may modify the community control sanctions or conditions of release previously imposed, substitute a community control sanction or condition of release for another community control sanction or condition of release previously imposed, or impose an additional community control sanction or condition of release. (C)(1) If a court sentences an offender to any community control sanction or combination of community control sanctions authorized under section 2929.26, 2929.27, or 2929.28 of the Revised Code, the court shall place the offender under the general control and supervision of the court or of a department of probation in the jurisdiction that serves the court for purposes of reporting to the court a violation of any of the conditions of the sanctions imposed. If the offender resides in another jurisdiction and a department of probation has been established to serve the municipal court or county court in that jurisdiction, the sentencing court may request the municipal court or the county court to receive the offender into the general control and supervision of that department of probation for purposes of reporting to the sentencing court a violation of any of the conditions of the sanctions imposed. The sentencing court retains jurisdiction over any offender whom it sentences for the duration of the sanction or sanctions imposed. (2) The sentencing court shall require as a condition of any community control sanction that the offender abide by the law and not leave the state without the permission of the court or the offender's probation officer. In the interests of doing justice, rehabilitating the offender, and ensuring the offender's good behavior, the court may impose additional requirements on the offender. The offender's compliance with the additional requirements also shall be a condition of the community control sanction imposed upon the offender. (D)(1) If the court imposing sentence upon an offender sentences the offender to any community control sanction or combination of community control sanctions authorized under section 2929.26, 2929.27, or 2929.28 of the Revised Code, and if the offender violates any of the conditions of the sanctions, the public or private person or entity that supervises or administers the program or activity that comprises the sanction shall report the violation directly to the sentencing court or to the department of probation or probation officer with general control and supervision over the offender. If the public or private person or entity reports the violation to the department of probation or probation officer, the department or officer shall report the violation to the sentencing court. (2) Except as provided in division (D)(3) of this section, if an offender violates any condition of a community control sanction, the sentencing court may impose upon the violator one or more of the following penalties: (a) A longer time under the same community control sanction if the total time under all of the community control sanctions imposed on the violator does not exceed the five-year limit specified in division (A)(2) of this section; (b) A more restrictive community control sanction; (c) A combination of community control sanctions, including a jail term; (d) Subject to division (D)(3) of this section, a term of not more than one year under the same sanction if the total time under the sanction does not exceed five years and the court conducts a hearing and finds either of the following: (i) In the six months prior to the hearing, the offender has consistently demonstrated a willful refusal to comply with required mental or behavioral health treatment imposed as a condition of the community control sanction, and the court cannot appropriately respond in the remaining period of the community control sanction; (ii) The offender is required to complete programming as a condition of the community control sanction, and has not completed the programming at the conclusion of the initial supervision term. (e) If the offender is required to pay restitution pursuant to section 2929.28 or 2929.281 of the Revised Code, subject to division (D)(3) of this section, a longer time under the same sanction if the total time under the sanction does not exceed the time required for the offender to complete the restitution payments or five years, whichever is less, if the court conducts a hearing and finds all of the following: (i) The offender has consistently demonstrated a willful refusal to pay restitution imposed as a condition of the community control sanction; (ii) The offender has the ability to pay restitution without suffering an undue financial burden; (iii) The civil remedies and procedures described in division (D) of section 2929.18 of the Revised Code are insufficient to allow the victim of the offender's criminal offense or the victim's estate to recover restitution after the period of the community control sanction has terminated. (3)(a) A court is not limited in the number of times it may sentence an offender to a term described in divisions (D)(2)(d) or (e) of this section if the total time under the sanction does not exceed five years. (b) If the court imposes a term described in division (D)(2)(d) of this section, the offender shall not be subject to any conditions of supervision under the community control sanction except for complying with mental or behavioral health treatment or completing required programming during the extended term. If the court imposes a term described in division (D)(2)(e) of this section, the offender shall not be subject to any conditions of supervision under the community control sanction except for payment of restitution during the extended term. (3)(4) If an offender was acting pursuant to division (B)(2)(b) of section 2925.11 or a related provision under section 2925.12, 2925.14, or 2925.141 of the Revised Code and in so doing violated the conditions of a community control sanction based on a minor drug possession offense, as defined in section 2925.11 of the Revised Code, or violated section 2925.12, division (C)(1) of section 2925.14, or section 2925.141 of the Revised Code, the sentencing court shall not impose any of the penalties described in division (D)(2) of this section based on the violation. (4)(5) If the court imposes a jail term upon a violator pursuant to division (D)(2) of this section, the total time spent in jail for the misdemeanor offense and the violation of a condition of the community control sanction shall not exceed the maximum jail term available for the offense for which the sanction that was violated was imposed. The court may reduce the longer period of time that the violator is required to spend under the longer sanction or the more restrictive sanction imposed under division (D)(2) of this section by all or part of the time the violator successfully spent under the sanction that was initially imposed. (E) Except as otherwise provided in this division, if an offender, for a significant period of time, fulfills the conditions of a community control sanction imposed pursuant to section 2929.26, 2929.27, or 2929.28 of the Revised Code in an exemplary manner, the court may reduce the period of time under the community control sanction or impose a less restrictive community control sanction. Fulfilling the conditions of a community control sanction does not relieve the offender of a duty to make restitution under section 2929.28 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2951.02. (A)(1) During the period of a misdemeanor offender's community control sanction or during the period of a felony offender's nonresidential sanction, authorized probation officers who are engaged within the scope of their supervisory duties or responsibilities may search, with or without a warrant, the person of the offender, the place of residence of the offender, and a motor vehicle, another item of tangible or intangible personal property, or other real property in which the offender has a right, title, or interest or for which the offender has the express or implied permission of a person with a right, title, or interest to use, occupy, or possess if any of the following apply: (a) The probation officers have reasonable grounds to believe that the offender is not abiding by the law or otherwise is not complying with the conditions of the misdemeanor offender's community control sanction or the conditions of the felony offender's nonresidential sanction. (b) If the offender is a felony offender, the court requires the offender's consent to searches as part of the terms and conditions of community control, and the offender agreed to those terms and conditions. (c) If the offender is a felony offender, the offender otherwise provides consent for the search. (2) If a felony offender who is sentenced to a nonresidential sanction is under the general control and supervision of the adult parole authority, as described in division (A)(2)(a) of section 2929.15 of the Revised Code, adult parole authority field officers with supervisory responsibilities over the felony offender shall have the same search authority relative to the felony offender during the period of the sanction that is described under division (A)(1) of this section for probation officers. (3) If a misdemeanor offender is placed under a community control sanction pursuant to section 2929.25 of the Revised Code or if a felony offender is sentenced to a nonresidential sanction pursuant to section 2929.17 of the Revised Code, the court that places the misdemeanor offender under the sanction or sentences the felony offender to the sanction shall provide the offender with a written notice that informs the offender that authorized probation officers or adult parole authority field officers with supervisory responsibilities over the offender who are engaged within the scope of their supervisory duties or responsibilities may conduct the types of searches described in divisions (A)(1) and (2) of this section during the period of community control sanction or the nonresidential sanction if any of the following apply: (a) The officers have reasonable grounds to believe that the offender is not abiding by the law or otherwise is not complying with the conditions of the offender's community control sanction or nonresidential sanction. (b) If the offender is a felony offender, the court requires the offender's consent to searches as part of the terms and conditions of community control, and the offender agreed to those terms and conditions. (c) If the offender is a felony offender, the offender otherwise provides consent for the search. (B) If an offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to a misdemeanor, the court may require the offender, as a condition of the offender's sentence of a community control sanction, to perform supervised community service work in accordance with this division. If an offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to a felony, the court, pursuant to sections 2929.15 and 2929.17 of the Revised Code, may impose a sanction that requires the offender to perform supervised community service work in accordance with this division. The supervised community service work shall be under the authority of health districts, park districts, counties, municipal corporations, townships, other political subdivisions of the state, or agencies of the state or any of its political subdivisions, or under the authority of charitable organizations that render services to the community or its citizens, in accordance with this division. The court may require an offender who is ordered to perform the work to pay to it a reasonable fee to cover the costs of the offender's participation in the work, including, but not limited to, the costs of procuring a policy or policies of liability insurance to cover the period during which the offender will perform the work. A court may permit any offender convicted of a felony or a misdemeanor to satisfy the payment of a fine imposed for the offense pursuant to section 2929.18 or 2929.28 of the Revised Code by performing supervised community service work as described in this division if the offender requests an opportunity to satisfy the payment by this means and if the court determines that the offender is financially unable to pay the fine. After imposing a term of community service, the court may modify the sentence to authorize a reasonable contribution to the appropriate general fund as provided in division (B) of section 2929.27 of the Revised Code. The supervised community service work that may be imposed under this division shall be subject to the following limitations: (1) The court shall fix the period of the work and, if necessary, shall distribute it over weekends or over other appropriate times that will allow the offender to continue at the offender's occupation or to care for the offender's family. The period of the work as fixed by the court shall not exceed in the aggregate the number of hours of community service imposed by the court pursuant to section 2929.17 or 2929.27 of the Revised Code. (2) An agency, political subdivision, or charitable organization must agree to accept the offender for the work before the court requires the offender to perform the work for the entity. A court shall not require an offender to perform supervised community service work for an agency, political subdivision, or charitable organization at a location that is an unreasonable distance from the offender's residence or domicile, unless the offender is provided with transportation to the location where the work is to be performed. (3) A court may enter into an agreement with a county department of job and family services for the management, placement, and supervision of offenders eligible for community service work in work activities, developmental activities, and alternative work activities under sections 5107.40 to 5107.69 of the Revised Code. If a court and a county department of job and family services have entered into an agreement of that nature, the clerk of that court is authorized to pay directly to the county department all or a portion of the fees collected by the court pursuant to this division in accordance with the terms of its agreement. (4) Community service work that a court requires under this division shall be supervised by an official of the agency, political subdivision, or charitable organization for which the work is performed or by a person designated by the agency, political subdivision, or charitable organization. The official or designated person shall be qualified for the supervision by education, training, or experience, and periodically shall report, in writing, to the court and to the offender's probation officer concerning the conduct of the offender in performing the work. (5) The total of any period of supervised community service work imposed on an offender under division (B) of this section plus the period of all other sanctions imposed pursuant to sections 2929.15, 2929.16, 2929.17, and 2929.18 of the Revised Code for a felony, or pursuant to sections 2929.25, 2929.26, 2929.27, and 2929.28 of the Revised Code for a misdemeanor, shall not exceed five years the community control maximum specified in section 2929.15 of the Revised Code that is applicable to the offense if it is a felony or the community control maximum specified in section 2929.25 of the Revised Code if the offense is a misdemeanor. (C)(1) If an offender is convicted of a violation of section 4511.19 of the Revised Code or a substantially similar municipal ordinance, the court may require, as a condition of a community control sanction, that the offender operate only a motor vehicle equipped with an ignition interlock device that is certified pursuant to section 4510.43 of the Revised Code. (2) If a court requires an offender, as a condition of a community control sanction pursuant to division (C)(1) of this section, to operate only a motor vehicle equipped with an ignition interlock device that is certified pursuant to section 4510.43 of the Revised Code, the offender immediately shall surrender the offender's driver's or commercial driver's license or permit to the court. Upon the receipt of the offender's license or permit, the court shall issue an order authorizing the offender to operate a motor vehicle equipped with a certified ignition interlock device and deliver the offender's license or permit to the registrar of motor vehicles. The court also shall give the offender a copy of its order for purposes of obtaining a restricted license. (3) An offender shall present to the registrar or to a deputy registrar the copy of the order issued under division (C) of this section and a certificate affirming the installation of an ignition interlock device that is in a form established by the director of public safety and that is signed by the person who installed the device. Upon presentation of the order and certificate, the registrar or deputy registrar shall issue a restricted license to the offender, unless the offender's driver's license or commercial driver's license or permit is suspended under any other provision of law and limited driving privileges have not been granted with regard to that suspension. The restricted license shall be identical to the surrendered license, except that it shall have printed on its face a statement that the offender is prohibited from operating a motor vehicle that is not equipped with an ignition interlock device that is certified pursuant to section 4510.43 of the Revised Code. The registrar shall deliver the offender's surrendered license or permit to the court upon receipt of a court order requiring it to do so, or reissue the offender's license or permit under section 4510.52 of the Revised Code if the registrar destroyed the offender's license or permit under that section. The offender shall surrender the restricted license to the court upon receipt of the offender's surrendered license or permit. (4) If an offender violates a requirement of the court imposed under division (C)(1) of this section, the court may impose a class seven suspension of the offender's driver's or commercial driver's license or permit or nonresident operating privilege from the range specified in division (A)(7) of section 4510.02 of the Revised Code. On a second or subsequent violation, the court may impose a class four suspension of the offender's driver's or commercial driver's license or permit or nonresident operating privilege from the range specified in division (A)(4) of section 4510.02 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2951.07. A community control sanction imposed for an offense continues for the period that the judge or magistrate determines and, may be extended, subject to the five-year limitfollowing maximums: (A) The community control maximum specified in section 2929.15 or of the Revised Code that is applicable to the offense if it is a felony. (B) The community control maximum specified in section 2929.25 of the Revised Code if the offense is a misdemeanor, may be extended. (C) If the offender under community control absconds or otherwise leaves the jurisdiction of the court without permission from the probation officer, the probation agency, or the court to do so, or if the offender is confined in any institution for the commission of any offense, the period of community control ceases to run until the time that the offender is brought before the court for its further action. Section 2. That existing sections 2925.11, 2929.15, 2929.20, 2929.25, 2951.02, and 2951.07 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. The General Assembly, applying the principle stated in division (B) of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that amendments are to be harmonized if reasonably capable of simultaneous operation, finds that the following sections, presented in this act as composites of the sections as amended by the acts indicated, are the resulting versions of the sections in effect prior to the effective date of the sections as presented in this act: Section 2929.15 of the Revised Code as amended by H.B. 110, H.B. 281, and S.B. 288, all of the 134th General Assembly. Section 2925.11 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 29 and S.B. 95 of the 135th General Assembly.